Utah statutes.
17-18a-702.   Multicounty prosecution district.

(1) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2), two or more counties, whether or not contiguous, may enter into an agreement in accordance with Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, to create and maintain a prosecution district.

(b)  A prosecution district described in Subsection (1)(a) shall include all of the area within the boundaries of each county party to the agreement.

(2)  A county may not enter into an agreement to create a multicounty prosecution district unless each county entering into the agreement is located within a single judicial district, as described in Section 78A-1-102, with the other party counties.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

